Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201813-3209
Debt service reserve fund.

A municipality that has created a clean energy assessment district may create a debt service reserve fund to be used as security for capital raised under section 13-3207.

Laws 2016, LB1012, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 18-3209;

Laws 2017, LB625, § 9.